District of Columbia statutes.
31-1705

Rulemaking.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules and regulations to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

History

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-127, § 6, 43 DCR 1559

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4305.